District of Columbia statutes.
34-305

Appointment and removal of inspectors and assistant inspectors of gas and meters.

The appointment and power to remove the Inspector of Gas and Meters and Assistant Inspectors of Gas and Meters from office is hereby vested in the Commission. All the powers and duties of such inspectors conferred and imposed by statute shall be exercised and performed under the supervision and control of the Commission.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 987, ch. 150, § 8, par. 59
1981 Ed., § 43-1005.
1973 Ed., § 43-605.